tr: Av tüfeği mekanizma tipi: Sürgülü; Kırma namlu (kombinasyon/drilling); Kırma namlu (çift namlu süperpoze); Kırma namlu (yan yana çift namlu); Kırma namlu (tek atışlık); Levyeli; Pompalı; Toplu; Yarı otomatik; Diğer
ro-RO: Tip de mecanism pentru pușca de vânătoare: Cu închizător (bolt-action); Cu țeavă basculantă (mixtă/drilling); Cu țeavă basculantă (țevi suprapuse - bock); Cu țeavă basculantă (țevi juxtapuse); Cu țeavă basculantă (un singur foc); Cu repetiție și levier (lever-action); Cu pompă (pump-action); Cu butoi (revolver); Semiautomată; Altele
lt-LT: Šautuvo veikimo tipas: Su slankiojančia spyna; Atlenkiamas vamzdis (kombinuotas / trys vamzdžiai); Atlenkiamas vamzdis (dvivamzdis, vertikalus); Atlenkiamas vamzdis (dvivamzdis, horizontalus); Atlenkiamas vamzdis (vienšūvis); Svirtinis; Pompinis; Revolverinis; Pusiau automatinis; Kita
da: Mekanismetype for haglgevær: Bolt-action; Knæklås (kombination/drilling); Knæklås (dobbeltløbet over/under); Knæklås (dobbeltløbet side-by-side); Knæklås (enkeltskud); Lever-action; Pump-action; Revolverende; Halvautomatisk; Andet
ja: ショットガン作動方式: ボルトアクション; ブレイクアクション (コンビネーション/ドリリング); ブレイクアクション (ダブルバレル 上下二連); ブレイクアクション (ダブルバレル 水平二連); ブレイクアクション (単発式); レバーアクション; ポンプアクション; リボルバー; セミオートマチック; その他
pt-PT: Tipo de ação de espingarda: Ação por ferrolho; Ação basculante (combinação/drilling); Ação basculante (canos sobrepostos); Ação basculante (canos justapostos); Ação basculante (tiro único); Ação por alavanca; Ação de bomba; Revólver; Semiautomática; Outro
it: Tipo di azione del fucile a pompa: Bolt-action; A bascula (combinato/drilling); A bascula (sovrapposto); A bascula (doppietta); A bascula (monocolpo); A leva; A pompa; A tamburo; Semiautomatico; Altro
fi: Haulikon toimintatyyppi: Pulttilukkoinen; Taittopiippuinen (rihlakko/drilling); Taittopiippuinen (päällekkäispiippuinen); Taittopiippuinen (rinnakkaispiippuinen); Taittopiippuinen (yksipiippuinen); Vipulukkoinen; Pumpputoiminen; Revolverilukkoinen; Puoliautomaattinen; Muu
zh-TW: 散彈槍運作類型: 栓動式; 折管式 (複合/三管); 折管式 (雙管上下並排); 折管式 (雙管左右並排); 折管式 (單發); 槓桿式; 泵動式; 轉輪式; 半自動; 其他
vi: Kiểu hoạt động súng săn: Nạp đạn bằng thoi; Bẻ nòng (súng hỗn hợp/súng ba nòng); Bẻ nòng (nòng đôi trên/dưới); Bẻ nòng (nòng đôi cạnh nhau); Bẻ nòng (phát một); Nạp đạn bằng đòn bẩy; Nạp đạn kiểu bơm; Ổ xoay; Bán tự động; Khác
sv: Typ av hagelgevärsmekanism: Cylindermekanism; Brytvapen (kombination/drilling); Brytvapen (bockdubbel); Brytvapen (sida-vid-sida); Brytvapen (enkelskott); Bygelrepeter; Pumprepeter; Revolver; Halvautomatisk; Övrigt
bg-BG: Вид на механизма на ловната пушка: С болтов затвор; Чупеща се (комбинирана/дрилинг); Чупеща се (двуцевна надцевка); Чупеща се (двуцевна успоредка); Чупеща се (еднозарядна); С лостов механизъм; Помпа; Револверна; Полуавтоматична; Друго
nl: Hagelgeweer actietype: Grendelgeweer; Knikloop (combinatie/drilling); Knikloop (dubbeloops over/under); Knikloop (dubbeloops juxtapose); Knikloop (enkelschots); Hefboomgeweer; Pompactie; Revolverend; Semi-automatisch; Overig
pl: Typ działania strzelby: Zamek czterotaktowy; Łamana (kniejówka/dryling); Łamana (bok); Łamana (dubeltówka); Łamana (jednostrzałowa); Zamek dźwigniowy; Pump-action; Rewolwerowy; Samopowtarzalny; Inne
cs: Typ závěru brokovnice: Opakovací s odsuvným závěrem; Zlamovací (kombinovaná/troják); Zlamovací (kozlice); Zlamovací (dvojka); Zlamovací (jednuška); Páková (lever-action); Opakovací (pumpa); Revolverová; Poloautomatická; Jiné
en: Shotgun action type: Bolt-action; Break-action (combination/drilling); Break-action (double-barrel over/under); Break-action (double-barrel side-by-side); Break-action (single-shot); Lever-action; Pump-action; Revolving; Semi-automatic; Other
zh-CN: 霰弹枪动作类型: 栓动式; 折管式（组合/复合）; 折管式（上下双管）; 折管式（并排双管）; 折管式（单发）; 杠杆式; 泵动式; 转轮式; 半自动式; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta mehanizma šibrovke: Repetirna (z zaklepom); Prelomna (kombinirana/drilling); Prelomna (bokarica); Prelomna (klasična dvocevka); Prelomna (enocevka); Vzvodna (lever-action); Potezna (pump-action); Revolverska; Polavtomatska; Drugo
de: Verschlussart der Schrotflinte: Kammerstängel-Repetierer; Kipplauf (Bockbüchsflinte/Drilling); Kipplauf (Bockdoppelflinte); Kipplauf (Querflinte); Kipplauf (Einzellader); Unterhebel-Repetierer; Vorderschaft-Repetierer; Revolver-System; Halbautomatisch; Sonstige
th: ประเภทการทำงานแบบปืนลูกซอง: โบลต์แอ็กชัน; หักลำ (ปืนผสม/ดริลลิง); หักลำ (ปืนแฝดซ้อน); หักลำ (ปืนแฝดขนาน); หักลำ (นัดเดียว); คานเหวี่ยง; ปั๊มแอ็กชัน; ลูกโม่; กึ่งอัตโนมัติ; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Espingarda ação tipo: Ação por ferrolho; Ação basculante (combinação/drilling); Ação basculante (cano duplo sobreposto); Ação basculante (cano duplo paralelo); Ação basculante (tiro único); Ação por alavanca; Ação tipo pump; Revólver; Semiautomática; Outros
ko: 산탄총 작동 유형: 볼트 액션; 브레이크 액션(콤비네이션/드릴링); 브레이크 액션(더블 배럴 오버/언더); 브레이크 액션(더블 배럴 사이드 바이 사이드); 브레이크 액션(단발); 레버 액션; 펌프 액션; 리볼버형; 반자동; 기타
hr-HR: Vrsta mehanizma sačmarice: S okretno-čepnim zatvaračem; Prijelomna cijev (kombinirana/drilling); Prijelomna cijev (bokerica); Prijelomna cijev (položara); Prijelomna cijev (jednometna); S polugom (Lever-action); Pumperica (Pump-action); Revolverska; Poluautomatska; Drugo
el: Τύπος δράσης καραμπίνας: Κινητού ουραίου; Σπαστό (συνδυαστικό/drilling); Σπαστό (δίκαννο αλληλεπίθετο); Σπαστό (δίκαννο πλαγιόκαννο); Σπαστό (μονόκαννο); Επαναληπτικό με μοχλό; Επαναληπτικό (Pump-action); Περιστροφικό; Ημιαυτόματο; Άλλο
ru: Тип механизма дробовика: С продольно-скользящим затвором; Переломное (комбинированное/дриллинг); Переломное (двуствольное, вертикальное); Переломное (двуствольное, горизонтальное); Переломное (одноствольное); С рычажным затвором; Помповое; Револьверное; Полуавтоматическое; Другое
hu: Sörétes puska működési elve: Forgó-tolózáras; Billenőcsövű (kombinált/drilling); Billenőcsövű (duplacsövű bock); Billenőcsövű (duplacsövű lapát); Billenőcsövű (egylövetű); Alsókulcsos; Előágyszános (Pump-action); Forgótáras; Félautomata; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ mechanizmu brokovnice: Opakovacia s odsuvným záverom; Zlamovacia (kombinovaná/troják); Zlamovacia (kozlica); Zlamovacia (dvojka); Zlamovacia (jednoranová); Páková; Pumpovacia; Revolverová; Poloautomatická; Iné
fr: Type de mécanisme du fusil de chasse: À verrou; À canon basculant (mixte/drilling); À canon basculant (superposé); À canon basculant (juxtaposé); À canon basculant (à un coup); À levier; À pompe; À barillet; Semi-automatique; Autre
nb: Mekanismetype for hagle: Boltmekanisme; Knekk (kombi/drilling); Knekk (dobbeltløp over/under); Knekk (dobbeltløp side-om-side); Knekk (enkeltskudd); Bøylemekanisme; Pumpemekanisme; Revolver; Halvautomatisk; Annet
es: Tipo de acción de la escopeta: Acción de cerrojo; Acción basculante (combinada/drilling); Acción basculante (doble cañón superpuesto); Acción basculante (doble cañón yuxtapuesto); Acción basculante (monotiro); Acción de palanca; Acción de corredera; De revólver; Semiautomática; Otro